District of Columbia statutes.
22-4016

No change in age of consent; registration not required for offenses between consenting adults.

(a)

This chapter does not change the age of consent for any sexual conduct under any law of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following do not constitute registration offenses:

(1)

Any sexual offense between consenting adults or an attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit such an offense, except for offenses to which consent is not a defense as provided in § 22-3017;

(2)

Any misdemeanor offense that involved a person’s sexual touching or attempted or solicited sexual touching of an undercover law enforcement officer where the person believed that the officer was an adult; and

(3)

Any misdemeanor offense committed against an adult, except where the offender agrees in a plea agreement to be subject to sex offender registration requirements.

July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 17, 47 DCR 797
This section is referenced in § 7-1301.03 and § 22-4004.